Massachusetts, session 194th, S2907.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4 (2) (c) of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof, the following:-
In the case of any member of the police and fire department who is part of the
contributory retirement system in a municipality within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts,
shall be eligible for credible service for the time the member would have served but for being
bypassed on an eligible Civil Service hiring list before being initially appointed as a police
officer or firefighter.
SECTION 2. The bypassed member shall meet the following criteria. (a) the member was
on an eligible list to be hired as a police officer or firefighter, (b) the member was skipped or
bypassed for another person with a lower rank on the civil service hiring list for a municipality
(c) the member was granted relief by an order or agreement approved by the Civil Service
Commission, pursuant to MGL c. 534 of the Acts of 1976 as amended by c. 310 of the Acts of
of 2

1993, after a by-pass appeal, placing the member back on the eligible hiring list, and (d) member
accepts the first available permanent appointment offered to the member by the municipality.
SECTION 3. The bypassed member shall be credited with active full-time service from
the bypass date to the date of the member’s permanent appointment so as long as the member
pays into the annuity savings fund of the retirement system an amount equal to the accumulated
regular deductions that the member would have paid together with regular interest, at the rate of
compensation the member would have received during the credible service period.
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect 90 days after enactment.
of 2